Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-107
State bird; western meadowlark.

The western meadowlark is hereby declared the state bird of Nebraska.

Laws 1929, c. 139, § 1, p. 495;

C.S.1929, § 84-725;

R.S.1943, § 84-717.